Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2112
Utilities district; general powers.

A metropolitan utilities district shall be a body corporate and possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes and in its name may sue and be sued and purchase, hold, and sell personal property and real estate. It shall have the sole management and control of its assets, including all utility rents, revenue, and income authorized by law, all utility property, real and personal, now or hereafter owned by the metropolitan utilities district or which may become a part of the common utilities system. It may exercise any and all the powers that are now or may be granted to cities and villages by the general statutes of this state for the construction or extension of utilities.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 2, p. 350;

R.S.1913, § 4244;

Laws 1917, c. 90, § 1, p. 242;

C.S.1922, § 3746;

C.S.1929, § 14-1002;

R.S.1943, § 14-1002;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1002;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 12.

The Legislature had right to transfer powers hereunder to the metropolitan utilities district. Lynch v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 192 Neb. 17, 218 N.W.2d 546 (1974).

A metropolitan water district is a body corporate. Erickson v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 171 Neb. 654, 107 N.W.2d 324 (1961).

Operation and maintenance of water and gas plants is not exercise of governmental functions but a private enterprise. Metropolitan Utilities District v. City of Omaha, 112 Neb. 93, 198 N.W. 858 (1924).